New York, session 2025-2026, A5375.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The insurance law is amended by adding a new section 3246 2 to read as follows: 3 § 3246. Reimbursement for anesthesia services. (a) An insurer issuing 4 a policy of hospital, medical, or surgical expense insurance pursuant to 5 this section or any other section of law shall not impose arbitrary time 6 caps on reimbursement for anesthesia services provided during medically 7 necessary procedures. 8 (b) Reimbursement for anesthesia services shall be determined based on 9 medical necessity as determined by the insurer, taking into consider- 10 ation the complexity of the procedure as evidenced by the submission of 11 medical records submitted by the attending anesthesiologist or licensed 12 anesthesia provider. 13 (c) (1) An insurer issuing a policy of hospital, medical, or surgical 14 expense insurance pursuant to this section or any other section of law 15 shall be prohibited from denying payment for anesthesia services solely 16 because the duration of care exceeded a pre-set time limit. 17 (2) Notwithstanding paragraph one of this subsection, an insurer may 18 use a time related reimbursement methodology for anesthesia services if 19 such methodology is based upon criteria established by an independent 20 organization, including the criteria used by the centers for Medicare 21 and Medicaid services to reimburse anesthesia services under title XVIII 22 of the United States Social Security Act (Medicare). If an insurer uses 23 a time related reimbursement methodology, it should have an established 24 process for the submission of additional medical records and the sharing EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09176-02-5 A. 5375--A 2 1 of electronic medical records to assess whether an increase to the 2 reimbursement is warranted. 3 § 2. The insurance law is amended by adding a new section 4331 to read 4 as follows: 5 § 4331. Reimbursement for anesthesia services. (a) Every corporation 6 subject to the provisions of this article that provide hospital, 7 medical, or surgical expense insurance coverage shall not impose arbi- 8 trary time caps on reimbursement for anesthesia services provided during 9 medically necessary procedures. 10 (b) Reimbursement for anesthesia services shall be determined based on 11 medical necessity as determined by the corporation, taking into consid- 12 eration the complexity of the procedure as evidenced by the submission 13 of medical records submitted by the attending anesthesiologist or 14 licensed anesthesia provider. 15 (c)(1) A corporation issuing hospital, medical, or surgical expense 16 insurance coverage shall be prohibited from denying payment for anes- 17 thesia services solely because the duration of care exceeded a pre-set 18 time limit. 19 (2) Notwithstanding paragraph one of this subsection, a corporation 20 may use a time related reimbursement methodology for anesthesia services 21 if such methodology is based upon criteria established by an independent 22 organization, including the criteria used by the centers for Medicare 23 and Medicaid services to reimburse anesthesia services under title XVIII 24 of the United States Social Security Act (Medicare). If a corporation 25 uses a time related reimbursement methodology, it should have an estab- 26 lished process for the submission of additional medical records and the 27 sharing of electronic medical records to assess whether an increase to 28 the reimbursement is warranted. 29 § 3. The social services law is amended by adding a new section 365-q 30 to read as follows: 31 § 365-q. Reimbursement for anesthesia services. 1. Any medical assist- 32 ance provider whose medical assistance includes the provision of anes- 33 thesia, including such assistance furnished through a managed care 34 program, shall not be subject to arbitrary time caps on reimbursement 35 when furnished during medically necessary procedures, and such payment 36 shall not be denied for such assistance solely because the duration of 37 such assistance exceeded a pre-set time limit. 38 2. Notwithstanding subdivision one of this section, a managed care 39 provider may use a time related reimbursement methodology for anesthesia 40 services if such methodology is based upon criteria established by an 41 independent organization, including the criteria used by the centers for 42 Medicare and Medicaid services to reimburse anesthesia services under 43 title XVIII of the United States Social Security Act (Medicare). If a 44 managed care provider uses a time related reimbursement methodology, it 45 should have an established process for the submission of additional 46 medical records and the sharing of electronic medical records to assess 47 whether an increase to the reimbursement is warranted. 48 § 4. This act shall take effect January 1, 2026.